zh-TW: 標記尖端類型: 刀片/裁切刀嵌件; 粉筆夾; 工程筆 (鉛筆); 自動鉛筆; 針頭 (大頭針); 劃線針; 針筆/墨水; 通用筆芯夾座; 其他
en: Marking tip type: Blade/cutter insert; Chalk holder; Lead holder (pencil); Mechanical pencil; Needle point (pin); Scriber point; Technical pen / ink; Universal insert holder; Other
bg-BG: Тип маркиращ връх: Острие/вложка за рязане; Държач за тебешир; Държач за графит (молив); Автоматичен молив; Иглен връх (щифт); Връх за чертане; Техническа писалка / мастило; Универсален държач за вложки; Друго
ja: マーキングチップのタイプ: ブレード/カッターインサート; チョークホルダー; 芯ホルダー (鉛筆); シャープペンシル; ニードルポイント (ピン); スクライバーポイント; 製図ペン / インク; ユニバーサルインサートホルダー; その他
es: Tipo de inserto de marcado: Inserto de cuchilla/cúter; Portatizas; Portaminas (lápiz); Portaminas mecánico; Punta de aguja (alfiler); Punta de trazador; Estilógrafo / tinta; Soporte de inserto universal; Otro
vi: Loại đầu đánh dấu: Mảnh dao/máy cắt; Đầu kẹp phấn; Đầu kẹp ngòi chì (bút chì); Bút chì bấm; Ngòi kim (ghim); Mũi vạch; Bút kỹ thuật / mực; Đầu kẹp đa năng; Khác
ko: 마킹 팁 유형: 블레이드/커터 인서트; 분필 홀더; 연필심 홀더(연필); 샤프 연필; 니들 포인트(핀); 스크라이버 포인트; 테크니컬 펜/잉크; 범용 인서트 홀더; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta pisalne konice: Vstavek z rezilom/nožem; Držalo za kredo; Držalo za mino (svinčnik); Tehnični svinčnik; Igličasta konica; Zarisovalna konica; Tehnično pisalo / tuš; Univerzalno držalo za vstavke; Drugo
ru: Тип разметочного наконечника: Лезвие/резак; Держатель для мела; Цанговый карандаш; Механический карандаш; Игла (булавка); Острие чертилки; Рапидограф / тушь; Универсальный держатель; Другое
hu: Jelölőhegy típusa: Penge/vágóbetét; Krétafogó; Belesceruza; Mechanikus ceruza; Tűhegy (gombostű); Karcolótű; Műszaki toll / tinta; Univerzális betéttartó; Egyéb
lt-LT: Žymėjimo antgalio tipas: Ašmenų / pjoviklio įdėklas; Kreidos laikiklis; Šerdelės laikiklis (pieštukas); Mechaninis pieštukas; Adata (smeigtukas); Braižiklio antgalis; Techninis rašiklis / rašalas; Universalus įdėklų laikiklis; Kita
de: Typ der Markierungsspitze: Klingen-/Messereinsatz; Kreidehalter; Minenhalter (Bleistift); Druckbleistift; Nadelspitze (Stecknadel); Reißnadelspitze; Tuschefüller / Tinte; Universeller Einsatzhalter; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทหัวทำเครื่องหมาย: ใส่ใบมีด/คัตเตอร์; ปลอกจับชอล์ก; ปลอกจับไส้ดินสอ; ดินสอกด; ปลายแหลม (เข็ม); ปลายเหล็กขีด; ปากกาเขียนแบบ / หมึก; ปลอกจับอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta vrha za označavanje: Umetak oštrice / rezača; Držač za kredu; Držač mine (olovka); Tehnička olovka; Iglasti vrh (igla); Vrh za urezivanje; Tehničko pero / tinta; Univerzalni držač umetaka; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta de marcação: Lâmina/inserção de corte; Suporte de giz; Porta-minas (lápis); Lapiseira; Ponta de agulha (pino); Ponta de riscador; Caneta técnica/tinta; Suporte de inserção universal; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul vârfului de marcare: Inserție tip lamă/cutter; Suport pentru cretă; Suport pentru mină (creion); Creion mecanic; Vârf de ac (bold); Vârf de trasat; Stilou tehnic/cerneală; Suport universal de inserție; Altele
fr: Type de pointe de marquage: Insert de lame/cutter; Porte-craie; Porte-mine (crayon); Crayon mécanique; Pointe d’aiguille (épingle); Pointe à tracer; Stylo technique / encre; Porte-insert universel; Autre
cs: Typ značkovacího hrotu: Čepel / břitová destička; Držák na křídu; Držák tuhy (tužka); Mikrotužka; Jehlový hrot (špendlík); Rýsovací hrot; Technické pero / tuš; Univerzální držák vložek; Jiné
nl: Markeerpunt type: Mes-/snij-inzetstuk; Krijthouder; Stifthouder (potlood); Vulpotlood; Naaldpunt (speld); Kraspunt; Technische pen/inkt; Universele inzetstukhouder; Overige
pt-BR: Marcação ponta tipo: Lâmina/cortador; Porta-giz; Lapiseira (lápis); Lapiseira; Ponta de agulha (pino); Ponta de riscador; Caneta técnica/tinta; Suporte de inserção universal; Outro
da: Markeringsspidstype: Klinge-/skæreindsats; Kridtholder; Stiftholder (blyant); Stiftblyant; Nålespids (knappenål); Ridsespids; Teknisk pen / blæk; Universalindsatsholder; Andet
fi: Merkintäkärjen tyyppi: Terä/leikkuriosa; Liitupidike; Lyijypidike (kynä); Lyijytäytekynä; Neulankärki (neula); Piirtokärki; Tekninen kynä / muste; Yleispidike; Muu
tr: İşaretleme ucu tipi: Bıçak/kesici ucu; Tebeşir tutucu; Uç tutucu (kalem); Uçlu kalem; İğne uç (toplu iğne); Çizici uç; Teknik kalem / mürekkep; Evrensel uç tutucu; Diğer
pl: Typ końcówki znakującej: Wkład z ostrzem; Uchwyt na kredę; Uchwyt na grafit (ołówek); Ołówek automatyczny; Końcówka igłowa (szpilka); Końcówka rysująca; Cienkopis / tusz; Uniwersalny uchwyt na wkłady; Inne
zh-CN: 标记笔尖类型: 刀片/切纸刀嵌件; 粉笔夹; 铅笔芯夹（铅笔）; 自动铅笔; 针尖（大头针）; 划线针尖; 绘图笔/墨水; 通用笔芯夹; 其他
nb: Merkespiss-type: Blad-/kutterinnsats; Krittholder; Blyholder (blyant); Trykkblyant; Nålespiss (stift); Rissespiss; Teknisk penn / blekk; Universell innsatsholder; Annet
it: Tipo di punta di marcatura: Inserto a lama/taglierino; Portagesso; Portamine (matita); Matita a scatto; Punta ad ago (spillo); Punta per tracciare; Penna tecnica / inchiostro; Supporto universale per inserti; Altro
el: Τύπος μύτης σήμανσης: Ένθετο λεπίδας/κόφτη; Βάση κιμωλίας; Βάση μύτης (μολύβι); Μηχανικό μολύβι; Μύτη βελόνας (καρφίτσα); Μύτη χάραξης; Στυλό σχεδίασης / μελάνι; Βάση ένθετου γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sv: Typ av märkningsspets: Blad-/knivinsats; Krithållare; Stifthållare (penna); Stiftpenna; Nålspets (stift); Ritsspets; Teknisk penna/bläck; Universell insatshållare; Annat
sk-SK: Typ značkovacieho hrotu: Vložka s čepeľou/orezávačom; Držiak na kriedu; Držiak na tuhu (ceruzka); Mechanická ceruzka; Ihlový hrot (špendlík); Rysovací hrot; Technické pero / atrament; Univerzálny držiak vložky; Iný